Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB373.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "abandoned vehicle" in section 102 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this title which are applicable to specific provisions of this title, the following words and phrases when used in this title shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:"Abandoned vehicle."(1) A vehicle (other than a pedalcycle) shall be presumed to be abandoned under any of the following 1234567891011121314151617181920 circumstances, but the presumption is rebuttable by a preponderance of the evidence:(i) The vehicle is physically inoperable and is left unattended on a highway or other public property for more than 48 hours.(ii) The vehicle has remained illegally on a highway or other public property for a period of more than 48 hours.(iii) The vehicle is left unattended on or along a highway or other public property for more than 48 hours and does not bear all of the following:(A) A valid registration plate.(B) A current certificate of inspection.(C) An ascertainable vehicle identification number.(iv) The vehicle has remained on private property without the consent of the owner or person in control of the property for more than 24 hours.(v) The vehicle has remained on the private property of a salvor for 20 days.(vi) The vehicle has remained on the property of a wholesale vehicle auction without the consent of the wholesale vehicle auction for more than three business days.(2) Vehicles and equipment used or to be used in construction or in the operation or maintenance of highways or public utility facilities, which are left in a manner which does not interfere with the normal movement of traffic, shall not be considered to be abandoned.* * *20250HB0373PN0329 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Wholesale vehicle auction." A person that:(1) is required to be licensed for commission, compensation or other consideration in the business of providing wholesale vehicle auction services at an established place of business, regardless of whether the person has custody or control of the vehicles; and(2) has the authority of the buyer or seller of a vehicle to negotiate or conduct a transaction on behalf of the buyer or seller under the act of December 22, 1983 (P.L.306, No.84), known as the Board of Vehicles Act.* * *Section 2. Section 7311.1(a) of Title 75 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 7311.1. Reports by private property owners of abandoned vehicles.(a) Removal of abandoned vehicles.--(1) A person on whose private property is located a vehicle which has remained on the property without the consent of the property owner or [his] an agent for more than 24 hours may authorize the removal or processing of the vehicle.(2) Prior to removal or processing of the vehicle, [that] the person shall file a report, on a multipart form prescribed by the department, with the local police department declaring that an unauthorized vehicle has been left unattended and on private property for at least 24 hours. One part of [such] the report shall be retained by [that] the person[,] and the other part shall be filed with the police department.(3) The police department shall, within five business 20250HB0373PN0329 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 days, process the vehicle as abandoned under this chapter and attach a copy of the report to the abandoned vehicle information report.* * *(c) Wholesale vehicle auction.--(1) An unauthorized vehicle that has been left unattended on private property shall include a vehicle intended for sale or that has been sold through a wholesale vehicle auction if the vehicle has remained on the property of the wholesale vehicle auction without the consent or authorization of the wholesale vehicle auction for a period exceeding three business days.(2) After the three-day period under paragraph (1), the wholesale vehicle auction may file a report under subsection (a). If the wholesale vehicle auction elects to file a report, the wholesale vehicle auction may remove, sell or legally obtain the ownership and title of a vehicle that is declared an abandoned vehicle on the property of the wholesale vehicle auction for which the report has been filed. The following shall apply:(i) A wholesale vehicle auction that intends to sell or legally obtain ownership of an abandoned vehicle shall indicate the auction's intention on the report that has been filed.(ii) If a wholesale vehicle auction follows the procedures outlined in this subchapter and the abandoned vehicle remains unclaimed, the wholesale vehicle auction may submit an application for a certificate of title to the department.(iii) If the department determines that a new 20250HB0373PN0329 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 certificate of title should be issued, the department shall issue an abandoned vehicle branded title to the wholesale vehicle auction.(iv) After an abandoned vehicle branded title is issued under subparagraph (iii), the wholesale vehicle auction shall offer the vehicle for sale at auction and provide notice to prospective buyers that the title has been branded as a former abandoned vehicle.(v) A wholesale vehicle auction that complies with this section shall not be subject to liability from the owner or seller of an abandoned vehicle removed, sold or otherwise disposed of under this section. A purchaser of an abandoned vehicle at a wholesale vehicle auction under this section shall not be subject to liability from the owner or seller of the abandoned vehicle.(3) The wholesale vehicle auction shall be reimbursed for all applicable costs related to the storage and processing of the vehicle under this subsection from the proceeds of the sale of the vehicle. The wholesale vehicle auction shall pay any remaining proceeds of the sale to the department for deposit into the Motor License Fund.(4) A wholesale vehicle auction may impose, charge and collect reasonable fees from the owner or seller regarding an abandoned vehicle. The following shall apply:(i) A wholesale vehicle auction may not impose storage fees of more than $25 per day and may not impose storage fees for the first three business days that the vehicle has remained on the property of the wholesale vehicle auction without the consent or authorization of the wholesale vehicle auction.20250HB0373PN0329 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) If the title for the abandoned vehicle has been transferred to the wholesale vehicle auction, the fees associated with the storage and processing of the vehicle shall be deemed to have been satisfied.(iii) Information regarding the fees under this paragraph shall be posted on the wholesale vehicle auction's publicly accessible Internet website or provided directly to each person utilizing the wholesale vehicle auction's services.(5) The wholesale vehicle auction may not impose storage fees on or after the date of transfer of the vehicle to a salvor, if applicable. If the abandoned vehicle has been transferred to a salvor and the vehicle is subsequently sold at a salvage auction:(i) The salvor shall recover the appropriate costs of towing and storage.(ii) The wholesale vehicle auction shall be reimbursed for the cost of storing, obtaining a title and processing related to the vehicle when the additional funds are available as the result of the salvor's auction. The wholesale vehicle auction shall pay any remaining proceeds of the sale to the department for deposit into the Motor License Fund.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB0373PN0329 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324